Utah statutes.
76-10-302.   Marking of containers of explosives before transportation or storage.

Every person who knowingly leaves with or delivers to another, or to any express or railway company or other common carrier, or to any warehouse or storehouse, any package containing nitroglycerin, dynamite, guncotton, gunpowder, or other highly explosive compound, or any benzine, gasoline, phosphorus, or other highly inflammable substance, or any vitriol, sulphuric, nitric, carbolic, muriatic, or other dangerous acid, chemical or compound, to be handled, stored, shipped, or transported, without plainly marking and indicating on such package the name and nature of the contents thereof, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

